Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 5

Geology

11-5-101. Division established — State geologist — Qualifications.

There shall be a division of the department of environment and conservation known as the division of geology, and a state geologist, who shall be a graduate of a recognized college and shall have had at least three (3) years' experience in practical geological work.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 37; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a89, 373a90; Code 1932, §§ 312, 622; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; C. Supp. 1950, § 622; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-501.

Cross-References. Powers of department of environment and conservation, §§ 4-3-503, 4-3-504, 4-3-505.

Records kept in department of environment and conservation, § 11-1-102.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 551.

11-5-102. State geologist — Powers and duties — Geological survey.

It is the duty of the state geologist, subject to the approval of the commissioner of environment and conservation, to:

Organize and direct the work of the state geological survey in field and office;

Determine the character, order, and time of publication of the reports of the survey, and to direct the preparation, printing, and distribution of the same;

Arrange for cooperative work with the various federal and state scientific bureaus where such work shall redound to the interest of the people of the state;

Appoint such associates, assistants, and employees as may be necessary to carry out successfully and speedily the work of the survey;

Procure and have charge of the necessary field and office supplies and other equipment, and supervise the acquisition, care, and distribution of the collections of the state geological survey; and

Perform such other work as may be necessary to the successful conduct of the survey.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 4; Shan., § 310a4; mod. Code 1932, § 625; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-502.

11-5-103. Objects and duties of state geological division.

The geological division has for its objects and duties the following:

A study of the geological formations of the state, with especial reference to their economic products, including coal, oil, gas, ores, fertilizers, building stones, road-making materials, clays, cement materials, sands, soils, forests, mineral and artesian waters, drainage of swamps, streams, and water powers, and other natural resources;

A study of the character, origin, and relations of the soils of the state, with especial reference to their adaptability to particular crops, the maintenance of soil fertility, and the conservation and utilization of supplies of natural fertilizers;

A study of the road-making materials of the state, with reference to their character, distribution, and the best methods of utilizing the same;

A study of the occurrence and availability of underground water supplies;

An investigation of the forests, streams, and water powers of the state, with especial reference to their conservation and development for industrial enterprises;

A study of the swamp and other nontillable lands of the state, with reference to their reclamation for agricultural purposes;

A study of the physical features of the state, with reference to their bearing upon the occupations, physical welfare, and intellectual pursuits of the people;

The preparation, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, of special reports with necessary illustrations and maps, which shall embrace both general and detailed descriptions of the geology, topography, and natural resources of the state;

The preparation, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, of special geologic, topographic, and economic maps to illustrate the structure, relief, and natural resources of the state; and

The consideration of such other scientific and economic questions as in the judgment of the commissioner of environment and conservation shall be deemed of value to the people of the state.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 5; Shan., § 310a5; mod. Code 1932, § 626; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-503; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 11, 12.

11-5-104. Printing and sale of reports and maps — Reports to general assembly.

The regular and special reports of the state geological division, with proper illustrations and maps, shall be printed and distributed and sold as the commissioner of environment and conservation shall deem best for the interest of the people of the state and as the commissioner may direct, and all moneys obtained by the sale of the reports shall be paid into the state treasury.

The commissioner shall cause to be prepared a report to the general assembly before each meeting of the same, showing the progress and condition of the survey, together with such other information as they may deem necessary and useful, or as the general assembly may require; provided, that the commissioner shall have the right to print and distribute the reports.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 6; Shan., § 310a6; mod. Code 1932, § 627; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-504.

11-5-105. Disposition of materials collected, records, books, reports, and equipment, upon completion or discontinuance of survey.

After having served the purposes of the survey, all materials collected shall be distributed by the state geologist to the educational institutions of the state in such manner as the commissioner of environment and conservation may determine to be of advantage to the educational interests of the state; provided, that if deemed advisable, the commissioner may first use such portion as may be necessary to establish a permanent exhibit of the natural resources of the state. On the completion or discontinuance of the state geological survey, the commissioner shall cause all records, notes, books, reports, charts, maps, manuscripts, instruments, and other equipment and property of the survey to be placed in charge of a suitable custodian to be held subject to final disposition by the general assembly; provided, that any field or other equipment which the commissioner shall deem undesirable to preserve may be sold as the commissioner may direct and the money turned into the state treasury; and provided further, that the copies of the reports of the survey left on hand for distribution shall be distributed by the custodian in such manner as shall be for the best interest of the people of the state.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 7; Shan., § 310a7; Code 1932, § 628; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-505.

11-5-106. Cooperation with federal and other state geological surveys.

The commissioner of environment and conservation is authorized to enter into cooperation with the United States geological survey and other scientific bureaus of the federal and state governments for the prosecution, at joint expense, of such work in the state as shall be deemed of mutual interest and advantage, and under such conditions as the commissioner may deem to be for the best interest of the people of the state.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 8; Shan., § 310a8; mod. Code 1932, § 629; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 56, 69; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-506.

11-5-107. Lands may be entered and crossed without damage.

In order to carry out this chapter, it is lawful for any person employed hereunder to enter and cross all lands within the state; provided, that in so doing no damage is done to private property.

Acts 1909, ch. 569, § 9; Shan., § 310a9; Code 1932, § 630; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-507.

11-5-108. Vandalism of caves or caverns.

It is an offense for any person, without the prior permission of the owner, to knowingly:

Break, break off, crack, carve upon, write or otherwise mark upon, or in any manner destroy, mutilate, injure, deface, mar or harm any natural material found within any cave or cavern, such as stalactites, stalagmites, helictites, anthodites, gypsum flowers or needles, flowstone, draperies, columns or other similar crystalline material formations;

Kill, harm or disturb any plant, animal or artifact found therein;

Disturb or alter the natural condition of such cave or cavern; or

Break, force, tamper with, remove, or otherwise disturb a lock, gate, door or other structure or obstruction designed to prevent entrance to a cave or cavern, whether or not entrance is actually gained.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the owner of property from performing on such owner's property any of the acts set forth in subsection (a).

An act constituting a violation of this section is to be valued according to § 39-11-106(a)(36) and punished as theft under § 39-14-103.

Acts 1991, ch. 62, § 1.

Cross-References. Grading of theft, § 39-14-105.